Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Sale of Engine Coolants and Antifreeze

§ 2841.
Aversive agent required.

As of January 1, 2011, a person shall not sell or offer to sell in this State any engine coolant or antifreeze that contains more than 10 percent ethylene glycol unless the engine coolant or antifreeze includes denatonium benzoate at a minimum of 30 parts per million and a maximum of 50 parts per million as an aversive agent within the product so as to render it unpalatable, except that this subchapter shall not apply to product inventory purchased by retailers prior to January 1, 2011.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 15

, § 2, eff. May 12, 2009.

§ 2842.
Records of manufacturer and packager.

Any manufacturer or packager of engine coolant or antifreeze subject to this subchapter shall maintain a record of the trade name, the scientific name, and the active ingredients of the aversive agent used pursuant to this subchapter. Information and documentation maintained pursuant to this subchapter must be furnished to any member of the public upon request.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 15

, § 2, eff. May 12, 2009.

§ 2843.
Limitation of liability.

A manufacturer, distributor, recycler, or seller of any engine coolant or antifreeze that contains denatonium benzoate as required under this subchapter is not liable to any person for any personal injury, death, property damage, damage to the environment or natural resources, or economic loss that results from the inclusion of denatonium benzoate if included in concentrations mandated by this subchapter. This section does not provide immunity to any person to the extent that the cause of liability is unrelated to the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in any engine coolant or antifreeze.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 15

, § 2, eff. May 12, 2009.

§ 2844.
Exceptions.

This subchapter does not apply to:

the sale of a motor vehicle that contains engine coolant or antifreeze; or

antifreeze or engine coolant for use in a manufacturing process, provided that the manufacturer complies with occupational safety and health standards for the use of the antifreeze or engine coolant and complies with the Agency of Natural Resources for the disposal of antifreeze or engine coolant containing ethylene glycol.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 15

, § 2, eff. May 12, 2009.